src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON I_18_3
	Clit;
	S0_0_6өөр_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_10өө_204_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_5өөс_201_v3_1_p;
LEXICON I_18_2
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_4_1
	Clit;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_2ид_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_4_2
	Clit;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2ид_201_v2_3_p;
	S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_4_3
	Clit;
	S0_0_6өөр_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_2ид_201_v3_3_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_10өө_204_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_5өөс_201_v3_1_p;
LEXICON I_4_4
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5ээс_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_2ид_201_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_10ээ_204_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_6ээр_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_8_1
	Clit;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5ас_201_v1_4_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10а_204_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_4йг_201_v1_2_p;
	S0_0_6ар_201_v1_4_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_8_2
	Clit;
	S0_0_5ос_201_v2_4_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v2_3_p;
	S0_0_4йг_201_v2_2_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6ор_201_v2_4_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_10о_204_v2_3_p;
LEXICON I_8_4
	Clit;
	S0_0_6эр_201_v4_4_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_4йг_201_v4_2_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5эс_201_v4_4_p;
	S0_0_10э_204_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_1йн_201_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_26_1
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ны_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_2анд_201_v1_4_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5наас_201_v1_2_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_26_2
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5ноос_201_v2_2_p;
	S0_0_1ны_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2онд_201_v2_4_p;
	S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_26_3
	Clit;
	S0_0_6өөр_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_10өө_204_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_2өнд_201_v3_4_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_5нөөс_201_v3_2_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_p;
LEXICON I_26_4
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5нээс_201_v4_2_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_2энд_201_v4_4_p;
	S0_0_10ээ_204_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_6ээр_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_22_1
	Clit;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_2т_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_22_2
	Clit;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2т_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_30_1
	Clit;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5гаас_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_1гийн_201_v1_2_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_4г_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6гаар_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_10гаа_204_v1_2_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_30_2
	Clit;
	S0_0_6гоор_201_v2_3_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1гийн_201_v2_2_p;
	S0_0_4г_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5гоос_201_v2_3_p;
	S0_0_10гоо_204_v2_2_p;
LEXICON I_30_3
	Clit;
	S0_0_1гийн_201_v3_2_p;
	S0_0_4г_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_10гөө_204_v3_2_p;
	S0_0_5гөөс_201_v3_3_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_6гөөр_201_v3_3_p;
LEXICON III_1_1
	Clit;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_11_4
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_2инд_201_v4_4_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5нээс_201_v4_2_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_10ээ_204_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_6ээр_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_11_3
	Clit;
	S0_0_6өөр_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_10өө_204_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_2инд_201_v3_4_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_5нөөс_201_v3_2_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ний_201_v3_1_p;
LEXICON I_11_2
	Clit;
	S0_0_5ноос_201_v2_2_p;
	S0_0_1ны_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2инд_201_v2_4_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_11_1
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ны_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5наас_201_v1_2_p;
	S0_0_2инд_201_v1_4_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_15_4
	Clit;
	S0_0_1н_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_4г_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5гээс_201_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_10гээ_204_v4_2_p;
	S0_0_6гээр_201_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_30_4
	Clit;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_1гийн_201_v4_2_p;
	S0_0_4г_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5гээс_201_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_10гээ_204_v4_2_p;
	S0_0_6гээр_201_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_15_3
	Clit;
	S0_0_1н_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_4г_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_10гөө_204_v3_2_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_5нөөс_201_v3_2_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_6гөөр_201_v3_3_p;
LEXICON I_15_2
	Clit;
	S0_0_6гоор_201_v2_3_p;
	S0_0_1н_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_4г_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5гоос_201_v2_3_p;
	S0_0_10гоо_204_v2_2_p;
LEXICON I_15_1
	Clit;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1н_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_4г_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6гаар_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_10гаа_204_v1_2_p;
	S0_0_5наас_201_v1_2_p;
	S0_0_2д_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_19_4
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5ээс_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_2эд_201_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_10ээ_204_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_6ээр_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_19_3
	Clit;
	S0_0_6өөр_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_10өө_204_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_2өд_201_v3_3_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_5өөс_201_v3_1_p;
LEXICON I_19_2
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2од_201_v2_3_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_19_1
	Clit;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_2ад_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON III_1_4
	Clit;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v4_1_p;
